Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6414
Rules and regulations.

The Director of Insurance may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Uninsured and Underinsured Motorist Insurance Coverage Act.

Laws 1994, LB 1074, § 14.

The Director of Insurance shall adopt and promulgate the carrying out of the provisions of the Uninsured and Underinsured Motorist Insurance Coverage Act. American States Ins. Co. v. Farm Bureau Ins. Co., 7 Neb. App. 507, 583 N.W.2d 358 (1998).